District of Columbia statutes.
8-403.03

Signs posted for exterior application.

(a)

Any person applying pesticides to a lawn or to exterior landscape plants shall post at the time of application a sign containing a uniform statement approved by the Mayor.

(b)

The sign shall remain for 48 hours following the pesticide application, after which time the property owner shall be responsible for the removal of the sign.

(c)

The sign shall be clearly visible:

(1)

From the principal places of access to the property; and

(2)

On the portion of the property where the pesticide is applied.

Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-70, § 4c
as added June 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-168, § 2, 55 DCR 5180